Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3132
Tax credit; recipient; effect on grant eligibility.

A production company that receives tax credits under the Cast and Crew Nebraska Act shall not be eligible for a grant under subsection (3) of section 81-1220.

Laws 2024, LB937, § 12.